updates/files/_internal/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_ru_RU.dic
UTF-8
.ави2
.ад1р
.ади2
.аи2
.ак1в
.ак1р
.аль5
.ас1п
.ау2
.аш1х
.аэ2
.бе2з1а2
.бе2з1у2
.бе2з3о2
.бе2с1т
.без1на
.без1р
.би2б1л
.бу1г
.взъ2
.во1в2
.во2п1л
.во2с3тор
.во2ск
.во3п2ло
.воз1на
.вс6п
.въ2
.вып2ле
.выс2п
.гос1к
.дво2е
.де2зи
.ди2а
.ди2сто
.до1см
.за3в2ра
.за3п2н
.зас2
.зау2
.заш2
.звуко3
.зо2о3
.иг1л
.иг1р
.ие2
.из1н
.из1р
.изо2бл
.ии2
.ио2
.ис1ти
.ис1то
.ис5тр
.иу2
.ию2
.кон2трн
.ле1м
.ль2
.ме2ж3
.ме3ж4ам
.ме3ж4ах
.ме3ж4е
.ме6жи2о
.мо2г1л
.на1ч2н
.на1ш2ко
.на2и
.на5в6
.не1в
.не1з2
.не1х
.не3о2тр
.не5л
.неа2
.небе2з1о2
.нем2но
.ни1с2к
.нос5к
.оа2
.об1ла
.об1ле
.об1ло
.об1лу
.об1ре
.об1ру
.об3о2ст
.об5лив
.об5лит
.обе2з1о2
.обе2с1т
.обо1ль
.ог5н
.оз2
.ос1пин
.ос2пар
.от1р
.от1хл
.от3в
.ото1м2
.по1в2
.по1ж2
.по2дыг
.по2дым
.по2дын
.по2дыс1
.по2дыт
.по2дыщ
.по2ст1ин
.по3дыми
.под1во
.пре1л
.пре2ж1д
.при1г2н
.при1м2н
.при3к2н
.прис2к
.про1сну
.про3сл
.прос2
.ра2зо
.ра2с1та
.ра2с1те
.ра2с1тек
.ра2с1теч
.ра2с1ти
.реги6о
.ро2х1
.сек1с2т
.сеп5т
.соп1л
.тек1с
.топ1л
.тран2с1
.трех1
.ть2
.уг1ле
.уг1ло
.уд2л
.уд2р
.уе2
.ук2
.ур6в
.ую2
.фи2зо
.хим1ч
.хла2
.ча2е
.че2ст1в
.чер2ст1
.четырех1
.эо2
.эя2
.юа2
.яи2
1адм
1апп
1атак
1б2лаго
1бв
1бе
1бл
1бри
1бу
1бю
1бя
1в2нук
1в2нуч
1в2сп
1в2сх
1в2сю
1в2шив
1ваг
1вак
1вег
1велл
1вер.
1вз2
1вих
1вич
1вл
1вок
1воя
1вп
1вр2
1вуд
1вы
1вю
1га
1гор
1гр
1д2ворь
1д2лев
1д2невк
1д2невок
1д2раж
1д2разн
1движ
1двиз
1дж
1дзе.
1дневн
1дняш
1дов
1дот
1доч
1дресс
1дро2г1н
1дроб
1дром
1дун
1дье
1дья
1жг
1жд
1жму
1зву
1зол
1зри
1зу
1кав
1кае
1кап
1кат
1каю
1кив
1кл
1ковы
1комп
1кон
1коо
1кос
1кош
1кр
1ла2пь
1ланд
1леде
1ли2п1т
1льо
1лью
1лют.
1м2нож
1маг
1мед
1мей
1мен.
1мкн
1мон
1мще
1мы.
1на.
1на1г
1на1с2
1над
1ниц
1но.
1ной
1ном
1нох
1ною.
1нрав
1ньо
1нью
1ня
1о2б1лач
1о2биж
1о2боз
1обес
1объ
1окт
1отд
1отп
1п2ленк
1п2ленок
1п2леноч
1п2лет
1п2салм
1пе.
1пенз
1печ
1пис
1плав
1плаз
1пле2с1к
1плик
1плос1к
1плы
1по
1пр
1птих
1пу.
1пя
1р2ви.
1р2вите.
1раб
1ралг
1реги
1реза
1рекла
1рисо
1росш
1рыб
1с2каф
1с2клон
1с2кре1ст
1с2креб
1с2паль
1с2посаб
1с4творч
1са
1св
1се
1сж
1си
1скоп
1сл
1со
1сп2лю.
1ср
1сто
1стров
1су
1сфе
1схе
1счас
1счит
1съ2
1сы
1ся
1т2кан
1т2ре2з1в
1т2ряс
1т2рях
1т4верд
1т4вор
1такт
1тека
1текш
1терл
1тече
1ткн
1тле
1толк
1торс
1торц
1точн
1тощ
1тре2с1к
1треб
1триб
1труб
1тяну
1узл
1ф2тор
1фа
1фи
1фл
1фо
1фр6
1фтонг
1фы
1х2лын
1хв
1хи
1хлеб
1хлор
1хр
1ху.
1цам
1цах.
1цв
1це
1ци
1цо
1цу.
1цы
1чел
1чив
1чик
1чла
1чле
1чо
1чт
1чх
1ш2в
1ш2кол
1ш2мы2г1н
1ши2б1л
1шпе
1шпил
1ште
1шту
1шю
1щи
1э2к
2а1ма
2а3о
2б1д
2б1лен
2б1ля
2б1н
2б1т
2б1ц
2б1ш
2б5к
2блас
2бль
2бр.
2брь
2в1лаб
2в1лен
2в1ли
2в1лю
2в1ляе
2в1лял
2в1ляю
2в1ми
2в1ре.
2в1ро
2в1ры.
2в1терп
2вль
2вр.
2г1б
2г1к
2г1м
2г1п
2г1с
2г1ш
2г5т
2гроп
2д1инсти
2д1к
2д1м
2д1ро.
2д1с
2д1ф
2д3ш2
2джс
2дны
2доблач
2докт
2дрс
2дь3те.
2е1ко
2е1о
2енр
2ж1к
2ж1ц
2жаве
2жавл
2ждл
2ждь
2з1б
2з1да
2з1инт
2з1инф
2з1к
2з1с
2здн
2зна.
2зны
2и1вы
2имене
2к1б
2к1г
2к1к
2к1ла.
2к1лак
2к1ли.
2к1ло.
2к1м
2к1т
2к1ц
2к1ш
2казк
2кл.
2кль
2кн
2кс
2л1н
2л1орг
2м1в2
2м1изд
2м1л
2м1ш
2н1с
2н1ц
2н1ш
2нбе
2невн
2нотд
2няш
2о1а2
2о1г
2о1за
2о1и
2о1ры
2о1со
2о1те
2о1тр
2о1у2
2о1хи
2о1э
2о5хро
2ов
2ол
2ом
2опир
2остал
2осф
2оф
2п1к
2п1лю.
2п1люсь.
2п1м
2п1н
2п1п
2п1сис
2п1ст
2п1том
2п1ф
2п1ц
2п1ч
2п1ш
2п3ту
2пс.
2псе
2псо
2псу
2псы
2р1орг
2р1укс
2рисп
2с1лиру
2с1лок
2с1лоц
2с1му
2сбу
2ск.
2скн
2сль
2смен.
2сны
2сск
2ств.
2стерл
2стк
2стн
2сть.
2сфор
2сэ2
2сяз
2т1вей
2т1г
2т1инф
2т1м
2т1н
2т1п
2т1с
2т1ф
2т1ц
2т1щ
2т1э
2тамп
2томщ
2тонг
2тр.
2трабо
2трб
2трг
2трд
2трм
2трп
2трр
2трф
2туч
2ть.
2ф1в
2ф1лен
2ф1н
2ф1орг
2ф1с
2х1ве
2х1г
2х1с
2х1у2г
2ц1г
2ц1з
2ц1к
2ц1л
2ц1м
2ц1о2д
2ц1от
2ц1п
2ц1с
2ц1т
2ч1м
2чтм
2ш1ф
2щ1н
2юм
2юю.
2юя.
2яю.
2яя.
3в2лия
3европ
3з2вуч
3зис
3и2мено
3и2мену
3к6ниж
3ная
3ник
3ную
3ны
3о2т1ряд
3п2сих
3план
3с2лав
3с2лов
3с2луж
3с2посо
3хор
3ч2мок
3чий
5би2о
5бот
5боц
5вая
5вуа
5двину
5деб
5до.
5дью
5жев
5зо.
5зью
5инж
5инсп
5к6то.
5коа
5коры
5л6жеш
5лиг
5лицо
5личи
5мий
5минг
5моти
5нап
5нац
5ниб
5откр
5посы
5прое6
5с2наб
5скоя
5смес
5смы
5сты
5течь
5тиге
5тиз.
5туды
5тушев
5хоз
5хом
5хоу
5ца.
5чан
5шло
5штр
6б1б
6б1г
6б1м
6б1с2
6б1щ
6бл.
6бь.
6в5рац
6вн.
6вск
6вь.
6г5лай
6гл.
6гн.
6гр.
6грек
6д1б
6д5роз
6дж.
6дз.
6дн.
6дотд
6др.
6дт.
6дь.
6евол
6евыд
6жд.
6з1ж
6з1м
6з1ру
6зная
6зь.
6ип
6й1
6к1ф
6кв.
6кеа
6кр.
6л1с2
6ль.
6льш
6м1б
6м1м
6м1п
6м1т
6м1че
6мс.
6мь.
6нр.
6нь.
6о5ба
6одар
6окл
6окол
6охор
6пл.
6пль.
6пр.
6прь.
6пт.
6пь.
6с1з
6с5чу
6скон
6сл.
6слям
6ср.
6сс.
6сст
6ст.
6стр.
6студы
6стьд
6стьс
6сь.
6т1б
6т1ред
6т1т
6твь.
6тинж
6тл.
6томс
6трв
6труп
6тч.
6тш.
6фр.
6фь.
6х1ч
6х5ви
6хв.
6хрь.
6хуем.
6хуй.
6хую.
6хуя.
6ценни
6ч1к
6ч5лег
6ч5леж
6чт.
6чь.
6ш1б
6шв.
6шл.
6шь.
6щь.
6ъ1
а1а
а1ба
а1бе
а1би
а1бо
а1бр
а1бу
а1бх
а1бы
а1бье
а1бьи
а1бью
а1бья
а1бя
а1ва
а1во
а1ву
а1вы
а1вье
а1вьи
а1вью
а1вья
а1вэ
а1вю
а1вя
а1га
а1ге
а1ги
а1гл
а1го
а1да
а1двор
а1де
а1ди
а1до
а1дра
а1ду
а1дцат
а1ды
а1дьи
а1дью
а1дю
а1дя
а1е
а1жа
а1же
а1жж
а1жи
а1жм
а1жо
а1жу
а1жье
а1жьи
а1жью
а1жья
а1за
а1зе
а1зи
а1зо
а1зы
а1зье
а1зью
а1зья
а1зю
а1зя
а1и
а1ка
а1ке
а1ки
а1ко
а1ку
а1кы
а1ла
а1ле
а1ло
а1лу
а1лы
а1лье
а1льи
а1лья
а1лю
а1ля
а1ме
а1ми
а1мо
а1му
а1мы
а1мье
а1мьи
а1мью
а1мья
а1мя
а1на
а1не
а1ни
а1но
а1ну
а1ны
а1нье
а1ньи
а1нью
а1нья
а1ню
а1ня
а1п
а1р6а
а1ре
а1ри
а1ро
а1ру
а1ры
а1рье
а1рьи
а1рью
а1рья
а1рю
а1ря
а1с2ше
а1са
а1се
а1си
а1со
а1ста
а1сте
а1сти
а1сту
а1сты
а1стье
а1стью
а1стья
а1стю
а1стя
а1су
а1сы
а1сье
а1сьи
а1сью
а1сья
а1сю
а1та
а1те
а1ти
а1то
а1тр
а1ту
а1ты
а1тье
а1тьи
а1тью
а1тья
а1тю
а1тя
а1у
а1фа
а1фе
а1фи
а1фо
а1фу
а1фья
а1фя
а1ха
а1хе
а1хи
а1хо
а1ху
а1ца
а1це
а1ци
а1цо
а1цу
а1ч2не
а1ча
а1че
а1чи
а1чу
а1чье
а1чьи
а1чью
а1чья
а1ша
а1ше
а1ши
а1шо
а1шу
а1шье
а1шьи
а1шью
а1шья
а1щ
а1э1
а1ю
а1я
а2в1ля
а2в1п
а2в1ра
а2вот
а2дын
а2зри
а2н1об
а2н5уз
а2п1с
а2п1т
а2с1тир
а2скоп
а2уле
а2ум
а2ун
а2ус
а2уэ
а2ш1лы
а2эр
а3гу
а3и2г1р
а5ве
а5ви
а5дви
а5з6у
а5ли
а5стры
а6нинс
а6томн
аа2п1
аг1ва
аг1д
ага5с6
ад1а2ген
ад1руга
ад5рез
ади2о
адь2
ае2ди
аз1ве
аз1ви
аз1во
аз1р
аи6з5
айм2а
ак1н
ак1с
акоп5л
аль1д
ам1но
ам1ч
ан1р
ан2кро
ан2скр
ан2сп
ан2сур
ан2сц
ана2с3н
анс1у
ао2ст
ао6к
ап1рел
ар2т1ор
арт2р
ас1к
ас1пу
ас1х
ас1ч
ас3по
ас5лет
ас5лям
ас5лях
ас5ми
асс2ме
асс6п
аст1ву
аста2п1
ат1л
ат5ви
атх1л
ау2чи
аут1р
ауэ1р
аф1ри
ач1т
аш1лив
аш1та
ая2з
б1ва
б1во
б1вя
б1ж
б1з6
б1лав
б1лег
б1лож
б1лом
б1раст
б1рыв
б1ф
б1х
б1ч
б5лиза
бас1м
бе2д1р
бе2з1у4с
бе2зы
бе2с1к
бе2ста
бег1л
бег1н
без1д2
без5в
безы2з1в
бес1х
бес1ч
бес3п
бесс2
би5стр
био5с
бис2к1в
бл1исп
бле2с1к
бо1д6р
бо1жж
бо1з
бо1рв
бо1с
бо2ес
бо2мч
бо2сс
бо3м2ле
боз2л
бра6сл
бст6
буг1л
в1б
в1в
в1г
в1д
в1к
в1лаг
в1ма
в1мо
в1н
в1с2
в1т
в1ф
в1х
в1ц
в1ч
в1ш
в1щ
в2нуш
в2хож
в2чер
в5рас
в6би
в6кус
в6сег
в6ход
ва1д
ва2дл
ва2дн
ван5с6
вах1
вдо1с
ве2д1р
ве2с1к
ве2ст1в
вез1до
верт1ля
вет3в2
вет4в3л
вз6р
взыс5
ви2ам
ви2б1р
ви2зн
ви5аф
ви5ол
виа1с
вк1н
во1дво
во1п
во2ж3ж
во2с1пе
во2с3ток
во2с3точ
во2стр
во3з2дан
воз1в
вои2с
вос1к
впо6л
вра2ж5д
вро5т
вто3к2
ву1з
ву1ст
ву5г
вче6т5
вы1ск
вы1сп
вы1тв
вы1х
вы1ш
вы5п
выпу2к1
г1г
г1з
г1ляе
г1лят
г1ляю
г1ч
г2нив
г2ном
г2раб
га1ст
га2у
ге2од
ге2оп
ге2ос
ге2оц
ге6об
ги1с
ги2б1л
ги2д1р
гко1в
го1з
го1п
го2зл
го2с1а
го2сб
гос3с
грив1к
гро2м1ч
гс2шиб
д1ва
д1ве
д1вид
д1вис
д1вод
д1г2
д1д
д1за
д1зв
д1зо
д1л
д1н
д1п
д1рас
д1реж
д1руб
д1рыв
д1ряд
д1т
д1х
д1ч
д2воя
д5зем
д5зи
да4о
дву1ш
дву2х1
дд2в
де1ст
де1х
де2ес
де2з1а2
де2з1о2
де2о
дес2к
ди2ад
ди2ам
ди2в1л
ди2о5с
ди2об
ди2с1е
ди5он
ди5х
дис1тр
дмо1с
дно5д
до1бр
до1д2
до1з
до1п
до1рв
до1с2п
до1сн
до1ш2
до2ру
до6бла
дох1л
дро2ж3ж
дря2б1
дс2н
дс3кн
ду1п
ду1ст
ду2о
ду2п3л
дым1н
дэ1г
е1а
е1ба
е1бе
е1би
е1бо
е1бр
е1бу
е1бы
е1бье
е1бью
е1бья
е1бю
е1бя
е1ва
е1ве
е1ви
е1во
е1ву
е1вы
е1вье
е1вью
е1вья
е1вю
е1вя
е1га
е1гд
е1ге
е1ги
е1глам
е1го
е1гу
е1д2лин
е1да
е1де
е1ди
е1до
е1ду
е1ды
е1дью
е1дю
е1дя
е1е
е1жа
е1же
е1жо
е1жу
е1жье
е1жьи
е1жью
е1жья
е1за
е1зе
е1зи
е1зо
е1зу
е1зы
е1зью
е1зья
е1зю
е1зя
е1и
е1ка
е1кв
е1ке
е1ки
е1ку
е1ла
е1ле
е1ли
е1ло
е1лу
е1лы
е1лье
е1льи
е1лья
е1лю
е1ля
е1ма
е1ме
е1мо
е1му
е1мы
е1мье
е1мьи
е1мью
е1мья
е1мя
е1на
е1не
е1ни
е1но
е1ну
е1ны
е1нье
е1ньи
е1нью
е1нья
е1нэ
е1ню
е1ня
е1о2кр
е1па
е1пе
е1пи
е1по
е1пу
е1пы
е1пье
е1пьи
е1пью
е1пья
е1пя
е1ра
е1ре
е1ри
е1ро
е1ру
е1ры
е1рье
е1рью
е1рья
е1рю
е1ря
е1с2г
е1с2клад
е1с2пот
е1са
е1сб
е1сд
е1се
е1си
е1ск
е1см
е1со
е1сок.
е1ста
е1ств
е1сте
е1сти
е1стр
е1сту
е1сты
е1стье
е1стью
е1стья
е1стю
е1стя
е1су
е1сы
е1сье
е1сьи
е1сью
е1сья
е1тье
е1тьи
е1тью
е1тья
е1тю
е1у2
е1фа
е1фе
е1фи
е1фо
е1фу
е1ха
е1хе
е1хи
е1хо
е1ху
е1ца
е1це
е1ци
е1цо
е1цу
е1ча
е1че
е1чи
е1чу
е1чье
е1чьи
е1чью
е1чья
е1ша
е1ше
е1ши
е1шл
е1шо
е1шта
е1шу
е1шью
е1ща
е1ще
е1щи
е1що
е1щу
е1щью
е1э
е1ю
е1я
е2в1мо
е2в1рит
е2д1о2щ
е2оди
е2она
е2оро
е2пси
е2р1у2п
е2с1би
е2с3пу
е2х1у2ч
е2хк
е3жи
е3звон
е3ола
е3он.
е3та
е3те
е3ти
е3то
е3ту
е3ты
е3тя
е5ми
е5ол.
е5олы
е5охл
е5ста.
е6стиг
еа2де
еа2з
еа2т1р
еа6да
ев2ним
ев2нят
ево2с
ег1ла.
ег1ло
ег1лы
еж1м
еж1р
ежа6т
ез1во
ез5ви
еи2г
еи2д
еи2м
ек1н
ек1сту
ем1не
ем1ного
ем1ч
ен1ри
ео1с
ео2б
ео2дет
ео2ж
ео2кон
ео2ру
ео2ч
ео2щ
ео6хв
еоб1л
еоу4
еп1ле
еп1ли.
еп1та
еп1то
еп5те
еп5тич
еп5тур
епи1т2р
ер1ват
ер1тя
ер6кл
ере1д2р
ере1дв
ере1зв
ере1п
ере1с2с
ере5гн
ереп2л
ери1ск
ерис2
еро6б
ес1п
ес2кле
ес2кош
ес2пас
ес5кур
ескрип1
ет1л
ет1р
ет2рд
еу3то
ех1о2к
ех5об
еш1то
ж1б
ж1ж
ж1з
ж1л
ж1ма
ж1н
ж1п
ж1с
ж1т
ж1ч
ж2же
жат1в
же1с2п
же5д2
жео2
жи2в1л
жи2л1от
жи2л1у2п
з1акт
з1вк
з1вя
з1г
з1дв
з1де
з1ди
з1ду
з1ды
з1дя
з1з
з1л
з1не
з1ни
з1но
з1ну
з1ню
з1общ
з1окс
з1орг
з1п
з1ра
з1род
з1ряд
з1т
з1ц
з1ч
з1ш
з1э
з2вук
з2вяк
з2г1ни
з2г1ну
з2рак
з2рач
з5вет
з5гна
з5дом
з5рез
з6вон
з6ть
за1вче
за1г2
за1др
за1з2
за1кв
за1р2д
за1р2ж
за1с
за1х
за1ш
за2шк
за3тм
за5тв
за5у
зае2
зан5с6
зас2н
зас4по
зат2
зач2т
зая6
зв2н
зве2т3в
зд2ва
зди2с
зз2л
зи6ни
зи6оно
зо1б
зо1д2р
зо1з2
зо1м2н
зо1рв
зо1с2
зо1щ
зо2бил
зо3м2л
зок2
и1а
и1ба
и1бе
и1би
и1бо
и1бр
и1бу
и1бы
и1бье
и1бью
и1бю
и1в2с
и1ва
и1ве
и1ви
и1во
и1ву
и1вье
и1вью
и1вья
и1вя
и1га
и1ге
и1ги
и1гл
и1го
и1гу
и1да
и1де
и1ди
и1до
и1др
и1ду
и1ды
и1дю
и1дя
и1е
и1жа
и1же
и1жж
и1жи
и1жо
и1жу
и1з2вез
и1за
и1зе
и1зи
и1зна
и1зо
и1зр
и1зу
и1зы
и1зью
и1зю
и1зя
и1и
и1ка
и1кв
и1ке
и1ки
и1ко
и1ку
и1кю
и1ла
и1ле
и1ли
и1ло
и1лу
и1лы
и1лье
и1льи
и1лья
и1лю
и1ля
и1ма
и1ме
и1мо
и1му
и1мы
и1мье
и1мьи
и1мью
и1мья
и1мя
и1на
и1не
и1ни
и1но
и1ну
и1ны
и1нье
и1ньи
и1нью
и1нья
и1ню1
и1ня
и1о
и1па
и1пи
и1пл
и1по
и1пу
и1пы
и1пью
и1пю
и1пя
и1ра
и1ре
и1ри
и1ро
и1ру
и1ры
и1рье
и1рьи
и1рью
и1рья
и1рю
и1ря
и1с2ни
и1са
и1се
и1си
и1со
и1ста
и1сте
и1сти
и1стра
и1сту
и1сты
и1стье
и1стью
и1стья
и1стю
и1стя
и1су
и1сы
и1сье
и1сьи
и1сью
и1сья
и1сю
и1т2раг
и1т2рес
и1т2рон
и1те
и1ти
и1то
и1ту
и1ты
и1тье
и1тью
и1тья
и1тю
и1тя
и1у
и1фа
и1фе
и1фи
и1фо
и1фу
и1ха
и1хе
и1хи
и1хо
и1ху
и1ца
и1це
и1ци
и1цо
и1цу
и1ча
и1че
и1чи
и1чу
и1чье
и1чьи
и1чью
и1чья
и1ш2п
и1ша
и1ше
и1ши
и1шл
и1шо
и1шу
и1шье
и1шью
и1шья
и1ща
и1ще
и1щи
и1що
и1щу
и1э
и1ю
и1я
и2а1г
и2ап
и2аф
и2евод
и2к1ч
и2л1а2ц
и2о1с2к
и2опр
и2ох
и2оц
и2пси
и2с1тин
и2т1л
и2ш1лы
и2юл
и2юн
и5гд
и5ми
и5оле
и5пе
и5та
и6п5тиз
и6тот
иа1ск
иас2
иг1н
ид1ц
иди3ом
иди5а
ие2ди
из1в
из1д
из1реч
из2ва
из2гн
изг1не
изо1т
изо2б1р
изо2о
изыс1
ик1н
икс1ту
иле1п
иле2п1л
иль1д
им1н
ино1д2ра
ино1с
инс2
иню2ш
ио2ста
ио5сп
иоб1ре
ип1та
ип1те
ип1то
ип1ту
ир5в
ис1б
ис1к
ис1м
ис1п
ис1тек
ис1ч
ис5тец
иск1н
ист1в
ит1ва
ит1ве
ит1р
ит5ву
иу2г
иу2ч
иу6р
ия2д
й2дв
й2ль
й2мс
й2нв
й2с1б
й2сн
й2сш
й5о
й6с5ф
йер1в
йко5п
йс2ко
йх2ск
к1д
к1на
к1но
к1п
к1ск
к1х
к1ч
к2вак
к2о1бес
к2св
к2сл
к2ст1ак
к5ж
к5лий
к5сте.
ка1д
ка1сп
ка1ст
ка2д1р
ка2дн
ка2ж1д
ка2п1л
ка2п1ре
ка3ус
каз1на
кам5н
каш3л
ква2д1р
ке1ст
ке5гли
ке5д
кеп1ти
ки3о2с3к
ки4с3л
ки5о
клю1ч
клю2чн
кно2п3л
ко1знан
ко1ск
ко2мин
ко2с3н
ко2св
ко2тл
ко5ств
ког2н
копу5
кор1в
кос1мо
кост1ля
кри2о5
кро2пл
кс1п
кс1тр
кт2рис
кус1к
л1ба
л1би
л1бо
л1в
л1г
л1д6
л1жа
л1же
л1жи
л1за
л1зе
л1зо
л1зы
л1к
л1л
л1м
л1п
л1т
л1ф
л1х6
л1ц
л1ча
л1че
л1чи
л1чу
л1чь
л1ш6
л1щ
л2вк
л2вн
л2вст
л2гат
л2ль
л2тк
л5бы
л6т5л
лау1
ле1т2р
ле2б1л
ле2о
ле2п1т
лег5л
лен2д1р
леп5ло
ли2б1р
ли2в1л
ли2к1в
ли2п1л
ли2т1уп
ли2тоб
ли5стр
ли6ос
ли6х5в
лк1н
ллю1
ло1д6р
ло1з
ло1пл
ло1ску
ло6бор
лос5ка
лох5л
лс2то
лу1д2
лу1с
лу2д3к
лу2д3л
лу2д3н
лу3б2р
лу5т
